src/morphology/affixes/noun.lexc
! =============== !
! Noun morphology !
! =============== !


! _________________ !
! Basic noun lexica !
! _________________ !

! Taken from the dictionary

! The nominal morphology is added in three layers.
! In this first one we add gender tags and morpho_
! phonological diacritics.
! The next two layers are for indefinite and definite
! suffixes, respectively.

! Compounds

LEXICON R
+Cmpnd#:   Nouns ;
           R_ ;

LEXICON R_
+Cmpnd#:%_ Nouns ;


LEXICON FINAL
+Cmpnd:%_ # ; ! menningar_ og granskingarskipan
          # ;

! Irregular

LEXICON k0
+N+Msc+Sg: FINAL ; ! januar

! Weak masculines.

LEXICON k1/3e
k1e ;
k3e ;

LEXICON k1/3
k1 ;
k3 ;

LEXICON k1/4
k1 ;
k4 ;

LEXICON k1e/48f !k1e/f84b Heini
k1e ;
k_flt48 ;

LEXICON k1 ! risi 
k1e ;
k_flt1 ;

LEXICON k1e
+N+Msc: W_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt1
+N+Msc: W_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLGEN ;


LEXICON k1_3stem
+N+Msc: W_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGDAT_mixed ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML W_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLGEN ;


LEXICON k2 ! beiggi
+N+Msc:%^JI W_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGGEN ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k3 ! hagi
k3e ;
k_flt3 ;

LEXICON k3e 
+N+Msc: W_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: W_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt3
+N+Msc: W_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML W_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: W_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k4 ! tanki
 k3 ;	! Same u_umlaut, but nasal cns

LEXICON k5 ! bóndi
+N+Msc:       W_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:       W_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:       W_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:       W_M_SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML W_M_PLNOM_UR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML W_M_PLACC_UR ;
+N+Msc:       W_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:       W_M_PLGEN ;


! Strong masculines

LEXICON k6/7
k6 ;
k7 ;

LEXICON k6/8
k6 ;
k8 ;

LEXICON k6e/12e
k6e ;
k12e ;

LEXICON k6e/19e
k6e ;
k19e ;

LEXICON k7/6
k7 ;
k6 ;

LEXICON k8/11
k8 ;
k11 ;

LEXICON k8/17
k8 ;
k17 ;

LEXICON k8/17e
k8 ;
k17e ;

LEXICON k8/6
k8 ;
k6 ;

LEXICON k9/16
k9 ;
k16 ;

LEXICON k6 ! úlvur
k6e ;
k_flt6 ;

LEXICON k6e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt6
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;


LEXICON k7 ! sandur
k7e ;
k_flt7 ;

LEXICON k7e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;


LEXICON k_flt7
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt8
k_flt7 ;

LEXICON k8e
k7e ;

LEXICON k8 ! garður
 k7 ; ! Different u_umlaut
 
LEXICON k_flt9
k_flt6 ;

LEXICON k9e
k6e ;

LEXICON k9
 k6 ; ! Double consonant deletion in front of s
 
LEXICON k10/11
k10 ;
k11 ;

LEXICON k10
k10e ;
k_flt10 ;

LEXICON k10e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt10
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ; ! Double dative.
+N+Msc:%^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k11/18
k11 ;
k18 ;

LEXICON k11 ! ísur
k11e ;
k_flt11 ;

LEXICON k11e/17f
k11e ;
k_flt17 ;

LEXICON k11e/26f
k11e ;
k_flt26 ;

LEXICON k11e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_NULL ;

LEXICON k_flt11
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;


! ir_stems

LEXICON k12/15
k12 ;
k15 ;

LEXICON k12/45
k12 ;
k45 ;
 
LEXICON k12/6f
k12 ;
k_flt6 ;

LEXICON k12 ! vinur
k12e ;
k_flt12 ;

LEXICON k12e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt12
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k13e
k12e ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;

LEXICON k13 ! vegur
 k12 ; ! As k12, plus a zero dative
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;

LEXICON k14 ! staður
k14e ;
k_flt14 ;

LEXICON k14e 
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt14
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k15/6
k15 ;
k6 ;

LEXICON k15 ! gestur
k15e ;
k_flt15 ;

LEXICON k15e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ; !s_gen

LEXICON k_flt15
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k16/27
k16 ;
k27 ;

LEXICON k16/9
k16 ;
k9 ;

LEXICON k16e
k15e ;

LEXICON k16
 k15 ; ! Double consonant

LEXICON k_flt17
k_flt15 ;
+N+Msc:%^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;

LEXICON k17/8/6
k17 ;
k8 ;
k6 ;

LEXICON k17e
 k15e ;

LEXICON k17
 k15 ; ! Standard, but also u_umlaut
+N+Msc:%^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;

LEXICON k18/11
k18 ;
k11 ;

LEXICON k18 ! dansur
k18e ;
k_flt18 ;

LEXICON k18e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_NULL ; ! s_final

LEXICON k_flt18
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;
 
LEXICON k19/12
k19 ;
k12 ;

LEXICON k19 ! meldur
k19e ;
k_flt19 ;

LEXICON k19e/15e
k19e ;
k15e ;

LEXICON k19e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt19 
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLGEN ;


LEXICON k20 ! akur
k20e ;
k_flt20 ;

LEXICON k20e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt20
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^UUML S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k_flt21
k_flt19 ;

LEXICON k21/20
k21 ;
k20 ;

LEXICON k21e
k19e ;

LEXICON k21 ! stuðul
 k19 ; ! Can't see the diffrence ==> but:
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ; ! here is the difference

LEXICON k22e 
k19e ;

LEXICON k22 ! himmal
 k19 ;               ! himlinum etc.
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;  ! himmalinum

LEXICON k23/19
k23 ;
k19 ;

LEXICON k23e/19e
k23e ;
k19e ;

LEXICON k23 ! róður
k23e ;
k_flt23 ;

LEXICON k23e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt23
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k24/25
k24 ;
k25 ;

LEXICON k25/17f
k25 ;
k_flt17 ;

LEXICON k25/24
k25 ;
k24 ;

LEXICON k26/12
k26 ;
k12 ;

LEXICON k26/45
k26 ;
k45 ;

LEXICON k26/6f
k26 ;
k_flt6 ;

LEXICON k27/25
: k27 ;
k25 ;

LEXICON k28/12
k28 ;
k12 ;

LEXICON k28/23
k28 ;
k23 ;

LEXICON k28e/12e
k28e ;
k12e ;

LEXICON k3/1
k3 ;
k1 ;

LEXICON k32/9
k32 ;
k9 ;

LEXICON k4/1
k4 ;
k1 ;

LEXICON k45/6f
k45 ;
k_flt6 ;

LEXICON k6/12e
k6 ;
k12e ;

LEXICON k6/15
k6 ;
k15 ;

LEXICON k6e/12
k6e ;
k12 ;

LEXICON k3e/14f
k3e ;
k_flt14 ;

LEXICON k24 ! fløttur
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k25 ! vøllur
k25e ;
k_flt25 ;

LEXICON k25e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt25
+N+Msc: S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k26 ! táttur
k26e ;
k_flt26 ;

LEXICON k26e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt26
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k27 ! vøkstur
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S_M_SGGEN_AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S_M_PLGEN ;

LEXICON k28 ! dráttur
k28e ;
k_flt28 ;

LEXICON k28e
+N+Msc: S_M_SGNOM_NULL ;
+N+Msc: S_M_SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_SGGEN_AR ;

LEXICON k_flt28
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLNOM_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLACC_IR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S_M_PLGEN ;
