src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
felagi:felag k1_3stem ;
tanki:tank k4 ;
blettur:blett k16 ;
fløttur:fløtt k24 ;
táttur:tátt k26 ;
vøkstur k27 ;
dráttur k28 ;
akul k21/20 ;
akur k20 ;
baktanki:baktank k4 ;
bakvegur:bakveg k13 ;
brýskur:brýsk k24 ;
byggakur k20 ;
bóndagarður:bóndagarð k8 ;
búfelagi:búfelag k1_3stem ;
dalur k8/17 ;
dani:dan k3e/14f ;
desember k0 ;
duradansur:duradans k18 ;
dótturbóndi:dótturbónd k5 ;
dýrdargripur:dýrdargrip k15 ;
eldkattur:eldkatt k10 ;
eldneisti:eldneist k1 ;
eldstaður:eldstað k14 ;
eyrvegur:eyrveg k13 ;
faddur k19 ;
farakundur:farakund k6 ;
felagshagi:felagshag k3 ;
fingrasnippur:fingrasnipp k9 ;
fingravøttur:fingravøtt k25 ;
fjallakambur:fjallakamb k7 ;
fjand:fjandi k1/4 ;
flórgarður:flórgarð k8 ;
fornlutur:fornlut k12 ;
friður:frið k13e ;
fríbóndi:fríbónd k5 ;
físur:fís k11 ;
fótaskammil k22 ;
geldsteggi:geldsteggj k2 ;
glymurdansur:glymurdans k18 ;
grann:granni k1/4 ;
grevstur k23 ;
grindahvalur:grindahval k17 ;
griðstaður:griðstað k14 ;
grovkambur:grovkamb k7 ;
grunsil k21e ;
grátusperðil k21 ;
gággufingur k19 ;
halgigripur:halgigrip k15 ;
hallarvørður:hallarvørð k25 ;
handilsjavni:handilsjavn k1 ;
haruhagi:haruhag k3 ;
helvtarvegur:helvtarveg k13 ;
herur:her k6/15 ;
hjallur:hjall k10 ;
hjartakramp:hjartakrampi k4/1 ;
hvalbingur:hvalbing k6 ;
hveitiakur k20 ;
hálsoddur:hálsodd k9 ;
háttur:hátt k26/12 ; !XXX from corp
útbúgvingarháttur:útbúgvingarhátt k26/12 ;
hávaður:hávað k14 ;
høvuðkambur:høvuðkamb k7 ;
illtanki:illtank k4 ;
jaksil k21/20 ;
jaksul k21/20 ;
januar  k0 ;
jemmil k22e ;
juni k0 ;
jólaseyður:jólaseyð k12 ;
kapittul k22 ;
kervil k21e ;
kirkjugarður:kirkjugarð k8 ;
klakkur:klakk k10 ;
klamsur:klams k11 ;
kongsbóndi:kongsbónd k5 ;
kongshvalur:kongshval k17 ;
krákudansur:krákudans k18 ;
krákungi:krákung k1 ;
kyrrindaróður k23 ;
kálhagi:kálhag k3 ;
kýpil k21 ;
langommubeiggi:langommubeiggj k2 ;
leguakur k20 ;
leiðangur k19 ;
ljómtrøstur:ljómtrøst k24 ;
lovsálmur:lovsálm k6 ;
loybummur:loybumm k9 ;
loynitang:loynitangi k1/4 ;
lívvølur:lívvøl k15 ;
mannavegur:mannaveg k13 ;
markattur:markatt k10 ;
marrakrossur:marrakross k11 ;
mars k0 ;
matur:mat k12e ;
merkisstaður:merkisstað k14 ;
minuttur:minutt k16 ;
miðvøllur:miðvøll k25 ;
navnagávuseyður:navnagávuseyð k12 ;
nevhvalur:nevhval k17 ;
nevi:nev k1 ;
neytahagi:neytahag k3 ;
nitrukambur:nitrukamb k7 ;
oktober k0 ;
ommubeiggi:ommubeiggj k2 ;
poppil k22 ;
rank:ranki k1/4 ;
rekafuglur:rekafugl k6 ;
ribesrunnur:ribesrunn k9 ;
romantikkur:romantikk k9e ;
rossabásur:rossabás k11 ;
roykur:royk k15e ;
ræðil k21e ;
rísakur k20 ;
rísakveistur k19 ;
rótakramp:rótakrampi k4/1 ;
røkstur k28 ;
rúsur:rús k18 ;
seiggil k22e ;
sessur:sess k18/11 ;
formanssessur:formanssess k18/11 ;
seyðabóndi:seyðabónd k5 ;
seðil k21 ;
skaðahvalur:skaðahval k17 ;
skemtigarður:skemtigarð k8 ;
skilatanki:skilatank k4 ;
smíðistiði:smíðistið k2 ;
snepil k21e ;
snjógvhag:snjógvhagi k3e ;
snørisróður k23 ;
sodningarvegur:sodningarveg k13 ;
songleikur:songleik k15 ;
spinnil k22 ;
sátustaður:sátustað k14 ;
síðuknappur:síðuknapp k10 ;
sósarlitur:sósarlit k12 ;
telduskíggi:telduskíggj k2 ;
timburmeistari:timburmeistar k1 ;
trøllakambur:trøllakamb k7 ;
trøstur:trøst k24 ;
tummil k22 ;
tummilfingur k19 ;
tussur:tuss k11 ;
tyngsil k21e ;
tálgarvørrur:tálgarvørr k25 ;
túnabiðil k21 ;
túnadansur:túnadans k18 ;
uglubóndi:uglubónd k5 ;
vand:vandi k1/4 ;
veðurrokkur:veðurrokk k9 ;
viðtøkugarður:viðtøkugarð k8 ;
vøttlingur:vøttling k6 ;
yvirkarði:yvirkarð k3 ;
fínsmiður:fínsmið k15 ;
spiralur:spiral k17 ; !XXX
íblástur k23/19 ;
ærseyður:ærseyð k12 ;
útróður k23 ;
frystikassi:frystikass k1/3 ;
húsfelagi:húsfelag k1/3 ;
langskalli:langskall k1/3 ;
pakki:pakk k1/3 ;
varmi:varm k1/3 ;
ódagi:ódag k1/3e ;
fagurleiki:fagurleik k1e ;
gróthamari:gróthamar k1e/48f ;
hamari:hamar k1e/48f ;
hjari:hjar k1e ;
klinkhamari:klinkhamar k1e/48f ;
lúni:lún k1e ;
skallhamari:skallhamar k1e/48f ;
hollendari:hollendar k1e/48f ; 
skammarroði:skammarroð k1e ;
útideyði:útideyð k1e ;
hjalti:hjalt k3/1 ;
jarnnagli:jarnnagl k3/1 ;
rokkanagli:rokkanagl k3/1 ;
ókunnuvarði:ókunnuvarð k3/1 ;
